Utah statutes.
4-3-10.   Unlawful acts specified.
It is unlawful for any person in this state to:
(1)  operate a plant without a license issued by the department;
(2)  market milk without a permit or certificate issued by the department;
(3)  manufacture butter or cheese, pasteurize milk, test milk for payment, or
haul milk in bulk without a special license to perform the particular activity
designated in this Subsection (3); unless if more than one person working in a
plant is engaged in the performance of a single activity designated in this
Subsection (3), the person who directs the activity is licensed;
(4)  manufacture, distribute, sell, deliver, hold, store, or offer for sale
any adulterated or misbranded dairy product;
(5)  manufacture, distribute, sell, deliver, hold, store, or offer for sale
any dairy product without a license, permit, or certificate required by this
chapter;
(6)  sell or offer for sale any milk not intended for human consumption unless
it is denatured or decharacterized in accordance with the rules of the
department;
(7)  manufacture, distribute, sell, or offer for sale any filled milk labeled
as milk or as a dairy product;
(8)  keep any animals with brucellosis, tuberculosis, or other infectious or
contagious diseases communicable to humans in any place where they may come in
contact with cows or other milking animals;
(9)  draw milk for human food from cows or other milking animals that are
infected with tuberculosis, running sores, communicable diseases, or from
animals that are fed feed that will produce milk that is adulterated;
(10)  accept or process milk from any producer without verification that the
producer holds a valid permit or certification or, if milk is accepted from
out of the state, without verification that the producer holds a permit or
certification from the appropriate regulatory agency of that state;
(11)  use any contaminated or unclean equipment or container to process,
manufacture, distribute, deliver, or sell a dairy product;
(12)  remove, change, conceal, erase, or obliterate any mark or tag placed
upon any equipment, tank, or container by the department except to clean and
sanitize it;
(13)  use any tank or container used for the transportation of milk or other
dairy products that is unclean or contaminated;
(14)  refuse to allow the department to take samples for testing;
(15)  prohibit adding vitamin compounds in the processing of milk and dairy
products in accordance with rules of the department; or
(16)  own, operate, organize, or otherwise participate in a cow-share program
where the milk producing hoofed mammal is located in Utah.
